Idaho statutes. Title 55 PROPERTY IN GENERAL
Chapter 18 SALE OR DISPOSITION OF LAND LOCATED OUTSIDE THE STATE
§ 55-1821. Service of process.

In addition to the methods of service provided for in the Idaho rules of civil procedure and Idaho statutes, service may be made on a person who has filed a consent to service of process by delivering a copy of the process to the office of the commission, but it is not effective unless the plaintiff (which may be the commission in a proceeding instituted by it):

Forthwith sends a copy of the process and of the pleading by certified or registered mail to the defendant or respondent at his last known address; and

The plaintiff’s affidavit of compliance with this section is filed in the case on or before the return day of the process, if any or within such further time as the court allows.

§ 55-1822. Evidentiary matters.

In any action, civil or criminal, where a defense is based upon any exemption provided for in this chapter, the burden of proving the existence of such exemption shall be upon the party raising such defense.

In any action, civil or criminal, a certificate signed and sealed by the commission stating compliance or noncompliance with the provisions of this chapter shall be admissible in any such action.

§ 55-1823. Penalties.

Any person who shall willfully violate any provision of this chapter or who willfully violates any rule or order of the commission made and served upon said person pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, or who shall willfully engage in any act, practice or transaction declared by any provision of this chapter to be unlawful shall be guilty of a felony.